Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 1. Fish Hatcheries and Stocking

§ 23-4-101.
Fish stocking in waters without consent prohibited; penalties.

No person shall plant or release any fish or fish eggs in any public waters of Wyoming without the consent and under the supervision of the department or its authorized personnel.

The escape of lawfully stocked fish or fish eggs does not constitute a violation of this section.

Violation of this section constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

The court may, in its discretion, revoke any license issued under this act to any person convicted of a violation of this section, for the remainder of the year in which the conviction occurs, and may suspend the person’s privilege to purchase or receive any other license under this act or to take any wildlife for a period of time up to and including lifetime revocation.

In addition to any other criminal penalty provided in this act, any person who violates this section may be assessed civil penalties in an amount not to exceed the costs incurred by the commission in removing the fish or fish eggs from the waters affected by the violation. The commission may bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction for civil penalties or injunctive relief.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 72; C.S. 1945, § 47-503; W.S. 1957, § 23-109; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-87; 2010, ch. 99, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, redesignated the existing provisions as (a), and added (b) through (e).

§ 23-4-102.
Operation of privately owned fish hatcheries, artificial lakes or ponds.

Any person who owns or operates a fish hatchery, artificial lake, pond or ponds for the purpose of raising fish for resale, may stock the fish hatchery, artificial lake, pond or ponds with eggs or fish procured from any lawful source. Any eggs or fish acquired from sources other than the department or federal government shall be inspected by an authorized agent of the department before planting.

Thereafter, the owner or operator may take fish from the hatchery, artificial lake, pond or ponds in any manner except by poison, explosives, or fishing except as otherwise provided in this section. The owner or operator may sell and dispose of any fish or fish eggs taken subject to any restrictions provided in this section.

“Artificial lake, pond or ponds” as used in this section means bodies of water created by the artificial diversion or storage of water not exceeding one hundred (100) acres in any one (1) surface area and does not include natural ponds, natural streams, or bodies of water wholly created by nature.

The owner or operator shall procure a license for the operation from the department. The owner or operator shall also post a five hundred dollar ($500.00) surety bond with the department. The bond shall be conditioned to the effect that the owner or operator will not sell or dispose of fish or fish eggs caught or taken in any of the waters of Wyoming other than those for which the license is issued, and to the effect that the owner or operator will keep a strict record of his operations under the license as may be required by the commission.

When an owner or operator sells or disposes of any fish or fish eggs, he shall deliver a certificate of sale upon a form to be furnished to the owner or operator by the department to the purchaser or receiver at the time the fish or fish eggs are delivered.

Any hotel, restaurant, cafe, or business house, or individual, may sell, serve, or dispose of fish purchased from any owner or operator in the regular course of business and shall exhibit upon request by any department personnel the certificate of sale furnished him by the owner or operator.

Whenever any of the fish or fish eggs are transported by a common carrier, each and every parcel of the shipment shall have a Wyoming game tag attached. The owner or operator shall obtain Wyoming game tags from the department and shall keep a strict record of all Wyoming game tags.

The owner or operator may operate a catchout pond, containing ten (10) surface acres of water or less, where fish may be caught by fishing. A charge may be made for this privilege by the owner or operator and the fishermen are not required to hold a valid Wyoming fishing license when fishing in a catchout pond.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 82; C.S. 1945, § 47-521; W.S. 1957, § 23-114; Laws 1969, ch. 141, § 2; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-88.

§ 23-4-103.
License to seine; license for dealers in live bait.

The department may issue licenses to seine or trap fish to such persons as it considers qualified upon application and payment of fees. The license entitles the holder to seine or trap fish at such time, place, and manner as provided by law and orders of the commission.

The department may issue licenses to deal in live bait to such persons as it considers qualified upon application and payment of fees. The license entitles the holder to deal in live bait at such time, place, and manner as provided by law and orders of the commission. The commission may regulate the type of live bait which may be sold and the source from which live bait may be obtained.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-89.

§ 23-4-104.
Fish hatchery protection; penalty.

Any person who, without consent of the owner, intentionally removes, destroys or introduces a substance into the waters of another with intent to destroy, any fish in a fish hatchery, artificial lake, pond including a catch out pond being used as a commercial aqua-culture operation is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the value of the fish destroyed is not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the value of the fish destroyed is more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 80, § 1.